Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202652-1313
Filing of effective financing statement; fees.

(1) Presentation for filing of an effective financing statement and the acceptance of the statement by the Secretary of State constitutes filing under sections 52-1301 to 52-1322.

(2) The nonrefundable fee for presenting an effective financing statement, an amendment, or a continuation statement for filing and indexing and for stamping a copy furnished by the secured party to show the date and place of filing of an effective financing statement, an amendment, or a continuation statement shall be fourteen dollars if the record is communicated in writing and eleven dollars if the record is communicated by another medium authorized by the Secretary of State. There shall be no fee for the filing of a termination statement.

(3) The Secretary of State shall remit any fees received pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 22;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 92;

Laws 2003, LB 4, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 1099, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 64;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB835, § 5.
July 18, 2026